Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2025.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2599.9. Reimbursements for Borrowing Costs During Budget Impasse.--(a) The following shall apply to the School District Impasse Recovery Fund:(1) The School District Impasse Recovery Fund is established.(2) Money in the fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department for the purpose of providing reimbursements in 1234567891011121314151617181920 accordance with this section.(3) The fund shall consist of all money appropriated for use under this section and any interest that accrues on the money.(4) Money in the fund:(i) May only be used for the reimbursements authorized under this section.(ii) May not be transferred or diverted to any other purpose by administrative action.(iii) Shall be used to reimburse school entities for eligible expenses incurred during an impasse period in accordance with this section.(b) The department shall reimburse school entities for all eligible expenses incurred during an impasse period in the fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the impasse period occurred.(c) The total amount of reimbursement under this section for a school entity may not exceed the documented eligible expenses submitted by the school entity.(d) The department shall develop an application to enable school entities to apply for reimbursement under this section. The application must include:(1) Itemized documentation of each claimed eligible expense. (2) Proof of payment or financial obligation.(3) Certification by the school entity's business administrator.(4) Other information deemed necessary by the department.(e) The department shall determine the method or manner in which applications under this section are submitted to the department.(f) Applications for reimbursement under this section must 20250HB2025PN2584 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be submitted to the department no later than forty-five (45) days following the end of the impasse period.(g) Not later than thirty (30) days following receipt of an application submitted in accordance with this section, the department shall review the application and, as appropriate, approve the reimbursement.(h) Not later than May 31 of the year following an impasse period, the department shall provide the following with aggregated data on the total eligible expenses incurred during the impasse period:(1) The Governor.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate.(5) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives.(i) The General Assembly shall appropriate money to the fund sufficient to reimburse school entities for all eligible expenses in the General Appropriation Act enacted for the fiscal year following the end of an impasse period.(j) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department" shall mean the Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Eligible expenses" shall include:(1) Interest on short-term borrowing.20250HB2025PN2584 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Fees for lines of credit.(3) Penalties for deferred payments to vendors or service providers.(4) Other costs associated with emergency financial measures taken due to an impasse period."Fund" shall mean the School District Impasse Recovery Fund established in subsection (a)(1)."Impasse period" shall mean a period after the beginning of a new fiscal year during which the General Appropriation Act for that fiscal year has not been enacted."School entity" shall mean a school district, intermediate unit or area career and technical school.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB2025PN2584 - 4 - 12345678910111213